Hawaii statutes.
D. Revolving Funds

§304A-2251 University of Hawaii
commercial enterprises revolving fund. There is established the University
of Hawaii commercial enterprises revolving fund into which shall be deposited
all revenues derived from the operation of commercial enterprises by university
programs and all fees and charges collected pursuant to section 304A‑1865.
Revenues deposited into this fund may be expended by the university for all
costs and expenses associated with the operation of the enterprises, including
hiring personnel, renovating commercial space, and purchasing merchandise,
supplies, and equipment, without regard to chapters 76, 78, 89, 103, and 103D.
Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the university may transfer all funds
at its disposal, with the exception of general funds and University of Hawaii
tuition and fees special fund moneys, into the revolving fund to finance the
establishment of new commercial enterprises; except that no more than ten per
cent of the tuition and fees special fund moneys may be loaned to the revolving
fund to finance the establishment of new commercial enterprises. Revenues not
expended as provided in this section may be transferred to other university
funds to be expended for the general benefit of the university. [L 2006, c 75,
pt of §2; am L 2008, c 106, §§1, 3; am L 2009, c 11, §13; am L 2010, c 42, §1;
am L 2016, c 230, §22]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next